District of Columbia statutes.
50-712

Civil penalty.

(a)

Each person who fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, prevents any inspection authorized by this chapter, or keeps false records shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $5,000.

(b)

Each violation of, or failure to comply with, this chapter shall constitute a separate offense and the penalties described in subsection (a) of this section shall be applicable to each separate offense.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 13
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(g), 41 DCR 7178
1981 Ed., § 40-2011.